Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-132
Biological parent; notice of nonconsent; filing.

A biological parent or parents may at any time, if they desire, file a notice of nonconsent with the department stating that at no time after his or her death and prior to the death of his or her spouse, if such spouse is not a biological parent, may any information on the adopted person's original birth certificate be released to such adopted person. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons subject to the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 14;

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 78.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.